Indiana, session 2026, SB265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-2-2-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) An employer or
his the employer's agent who:
(1) discharges or otherwise discriminates in regard to tenure or
condition of employment against any employee because the
employee has:
(A) instituted or participated in the institution of any action to
recover wages under this chapter; or
(B) demanded the payment of wages under this chapter;
(2) (1) pays or agrees to pay any employee less than the minimum
wage prescribed by section 4 of this chapter; or
(3) (2) fails to keep records required by section 8 of this chapter;
commits a Class C infraction.
(b) An employer or the employer's agent who knowingly or
intentionally violates section 4 or 8 of this chapter commits a Class A
infraction.
(c) An employer or the employer's agent who violates section 4 of
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


this chapter, having a prior unrelated judgment for a violation of
section 4 of this chapter, commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(d) An employer or the employer's agent who violates section 8 of
this chapter, having a prior unrelated judgment for a violation of
section 8 of this chapter, commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) An employer who takes an adverse employment action
against an employee because the employee has:
(1) instituted or participated in an action to recover wages
under this chapter; or
(2) demanded the payment of wages under this chapter;
commits a Class B infraction.
(f) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(b), a civil judgment for an
infraction committed under subsection (e) must be imposed as
follows:
(1) If the employer has no prior unrelated adjudication within
the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) If the employer has one (1) prior unrelated adjudication
within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) If the employer has two (2) or more prior unrelated
adjudications within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty
of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(g) An adverse employment action taken against an employee by
the employer within sixty (60) days of the employee:
(1) instituting or participating in an action to recover wages
under this chapter; or
(2) demanding the payment of wages under this chapter;
is prima facie evidence of an unlawful action under subsection (e).
SECTION 2. IC 22-2-5-4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "employer" means a
person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, or
other entity subject to this chapter.
(b) An employer who takes an adverse employment action
against an employee because the employee has:
(1) instituted or participated in an action to recover wages
under this chapter; or
(2) demanded the payment of wages under this chapter;
commits a Class B infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(b), a civil judgment for an
infraction committed under subsection (b) must be imposed as
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


follows:
(1) If the employer has no prior unrelated adjudication within
the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) If the employer has one (1) prior unrelated adjudication
within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) If the employer has two (2) or more prior unrelated
adjudications within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty
of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(d) An adverse employment action taken against an employee by
the employer within sixty (60) days of the employee:
(1) instituting or participating in an action to recover wages
under this chapter; or
(2) demanding the payment of wages under this chapter;
is prima facie evidence of an unlawful action under subsection (b).
(e) An employer who knowingly or intentionally violates section
1 of this chapter commits a Class B infraction.
(f) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(b), a civil judgment for an
infraction committed under subsection (e) must be imposed as
follows:
(1) If the employer has no prior unrelated adjudication within
the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) If the employer has one (1) prior unrelated adjudication
within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) If the employer has two (2) or more prior unrelated
adjudications within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty
of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).
SECTION 3. IC 22-2-9-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) An employer who takes an adverse employment
action against an employee because the employee has participated
in an action to recover wages under this chapter commits a Class
B infraction.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(b), a civil judgment for an
infraction committed under subsection (a) must be imposed as
follows:
(1) If the employer has no prior unrelated adjudication within
the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(2) If the employer has one (1) prior unrelated adjudication
within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) If the employer has two (2) or more prior unrelated
adjudications within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty
of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(c) An adverse employment action taken against an employee by
the employer within sixty (60) days of the employee participating
in an action to recover wages under this chapter is prima facie
evidence of an unlawful action under subsection (a).
(d) An employer who knowingly or intentionally violates section
2 of this chapter commits a Class B infraction.
(e) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(b), a civil judgment for an
infraction committed under subsection (d) must be imposed as
follows:
(1) If the employer has no prior unrelated adjudication within
the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) If the employer has one (1) prior unrelated adjudication
within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty of up to two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) If the employer has two (2) or more prior unrelated
adjudications within the previous five (5) years, a civil penalty
of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).
SECTION 4. IC 22-3-3-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) With respect to injuries in the following
schedule occurring on and after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 1991,
the employee shall receive, in addition to temporary total disability
benefits not exceeding seventy-eight (78) weeks on account of the
injury, a weekly compensation of sixty percent (60%) of the employee's
average weekly wages, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200)
average weekly wages, for the period stated for the injury.
(1) Amputation: For the loss by separation of the thumb, sixty
(60) weeks, of the index finger forty (40) weeks, of the second
finger thirty-five (35) weeks, of the third or ring finger thirty (30)
weeks, of the fourth or little finger twenty (20) weeks, of the hand
by separation below the elbow joint two hundred (200) weeks, or
the arm above the elbow two hundred fifty (250) weeks, of the big
toe sixty (60) weeks, of the second toe thirty (30) weeks, of the
third toe twenty (20) weeks, of the fourth toe fifteen (15) weeks,
of the fifth or little toe ten (10) weeks, for loss occurring on and
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


after April 1, 1959, by separation of the foot below the knee joint,
one hundred seventy-five (175) weeks and of the leg above the
knee joint two hundred twenty-five (225) weeks. The loss of more
than one (1) phalange of a thumb or toes shall be considered as
the loss of the entire thumb or toe. The loss of more than two (2)
phalanges of a finger shall be considered as the loss of the entire
finger. The loss of not more than one (1) phalange of a thumb or
toe shall be considered as the loss of one-half (1/2) of the thumb
or toe and compensation shall be paid for one-half (1/2) of the
period for the loss of the entire thumb or toe. The loss of not more
than one (1) phalange of a finger shall be considered as the loss
of one-third (1/3) of the finger and compensation shall be paid for
one-third (1/3) the period for the loss of the entire finger. The loss
of more than one (1) phalange of the finger but not more than two
(2) phalanges of the finger, shall be considered as the loss of
one-half (1/2) of the finger and compensation shall be paid for
one-half (1/2) of the period for the loss of the entire finger.
(2) For the loss by separation of both hands or both feet or the
total sight of both eyes, or any two (2) such losses in the same
accident, five hundred (500) weeks.
(3) For the permanent and complete loss of vision by enucleation
or its reduction to one-tenth (1/10) of normal vision with glasses,
one hundred seventy-five (175) weeks.
(4) For the permanent and complete loss of hearing in one (1) ear,
seventy-five (75) weeks, and in both ears, two hundred (200)
weeks.
(5) For the loss of one (1) testicle, fifty (50) weeks; for the loss of
both testicles, one hundred fifty (150) weeks.
(b) With respect to injuries in the schedule set forth in subsection
(e) occurring on and after July 1, 1979, and before July 1, 1988, the
employee shall receive, in addition to temporary total disability benefits
not exceeding fifty-two (52) weeks on account of the injury, a weekly
compensation of sixty percent (60%) of the employee's average weekly
wages not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) average
weekly wages for the period stated for the injury.
(c) With respect to injuries in the schedule set forth in subsection (e)
occurring on and after July 1, 1988, and before July 1, 1989, the
employee shall receive, in addition to temporary total disability benefits
not exceeding seventy-eight (78) weeks on account of the injury, a
weekly compensation of sixty percent (60%) of the employee's average
weekly wages, not to exceed one hundred sixty-six dollars ($166)
average weekly wages, for the period stated for the injury.
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(d) With respect to injuries in the schedule set forth in subsection
(e) occurring on and after July 1, 1989, and before July 1, 1990, the
employee shall receive, in addition to temporary total disability benefits
not exceeding seventy-eight (78) weeks on account of the injury, a
weekly compensation of sixty percent (60%) of the employee's average
weekly wages, not to exceed one hundred eighty-three dollars ($183)
average weekly wages, for the period stated for the injury.
(e) With respect to injuries in the following schedule occurring on
and after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 1991, the employee shall
receive, in addition to temporary total disability benefits not exceeding
seventy-eight (78) weeks on account of the injury, a weekly
compensation of sixty percent (60%) of the employee's average weekly
wages, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) average weekly
wages, for the period stated for the injury.
(1) Loss of use: The total permanent loss of the use of an arm,
hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange shall be considered
as the equivalent of the loss by separation of the arm, hand,
thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange, and compensation shall
be paid for the same period as for the loss thereof by separation.
(2) Partial loss of use: For the permanent partial loss of the use of
an arm, hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange,
compensation shall be paid for the proportionate loss of the use of
such arm, hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange.
(3) For injuries resulting in total permanent disability, five
hundred (500) weeks.
(4) For any permanent reduction of the sight of an eye less than a
total loss as specified in subsection (a)(3), compensation shall be
paid for a period proportionate to the degree of such permanent
reduction without correction or glasses. However, when such
permanent reduction without correction or glasses would result in
one hundred percent (100%) loss of vision, but correction or
glasses would result in restoration of vision, then in such event
compensation shall be paid for fifty percent (50%) of such total
loss of vision without glasses, plus an additional amount equal to
the proportionate amount of such reduction with glasses, not to
exceed an additional fifty percent (50%).
(5) For any permanent reduction of the hearing of one (1) or both
ears, less than the total loss as specified in subsection (a)(4),
compensation shall be paid for a period proportional to the degree
of such permanent reduction.
(6) In all other cases of permanent partial impairment,
compensation proportionate to the degree of such permanent
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


partial impairment, in the discretion of the worker's compensation
board, not exceeding five hundred (500) weeks.
(7) In all cases of permanent disfigurement which may impair the
future usefulness or opportunities of the employee, compensation,
in the discretion of the worker's compensation board, not
exceeding two hundred (200) weeks, except that no compensation
shall be payable under this subdivision where compensation is
payable elsewhere in this section.
(f) With respect to injuries in the following schedule occurring on
and after July 1, 1991, the employee shall receive in addition to
temporary total disability benefits, not exceeding one hundred
twenty-five (125) weeks on account of the injury, compensation in an
amount determined under the following schedule to be paid weekly at
a rate of sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) of the employee's
average weekly wages during the fifty-two (52) weeks immediately
preceding the week in which the injury occurred.
(1) Amputation: For the loss by separation of the thumb, twelve
(12) degrees of permanent impairment; of the index finger, eight
(8) degrees of permanent impairment; of the second finger, seven
(7) degrees of permanent impairment; of the third or ring finger,
six (6) degrees of permanent impairment; of the fourth or little
finger, four (4) degrees of permanent impairment; of the hand by
separation below the elbow joint, forty (40) degrees of permanent
impairment; of the arm above the elbow, fifty (50) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the big toe, twelve (12) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the second toe, six (6) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the third toe, four (4) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the fourth toe, three (3) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the fifth or little toe, two (2) degrees of
permanent impairment; by separation of the foot below the knee
joint, thirty-five (35) degrees of permanent impairment; and of the
leg above the knee joint, forty-five (45) degrees of permanent
impairment.
(2) Amputations: For the loss by separation of any of the body
parts described in subdivision (1) on or after July 1, 1997, and for
the loss by separation of any of the body parts described in
subdivision (3), (5), or (7), on or after July 1, 1999, the dollar
values per degree applying on the date of the injury as described
in subsection (g) shall be multiplied by two (2). However, the
doubling provision of this subdivision does not apply to a loss of
use that is not a loss by separation.
(3) The loss of more than one (1) phalange of a thumb or toe shall
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


be considered as the loss of the entire thumb or toe. The loss of
more than two (2) phalanges of a finger shall be considered as the
loss of the entire finger. The loss of not more than one (1)
phalange of a thumb or toe shall be considered as the loss of
one-half (1/2) of the degrees of permanent impairment for the loss
of the entire thumb or toe. The loss of not more than one (1)
phalange of a finger shall be considered as the loss of one-third
(1/3) of the finger and compensation shall be paid for one-third
(1/3) of the degrees payable for the loss of the entire finger. The
loss of more than one (1) phalange of the finger but not more than
two (2) phalanges of the finger shall be considered as the loss of
one-half (1/2) of the finger and compensation shall be paid for
one-half (1/2) of the degrees payable for the loss of the entire
finger.
(4) For the loss by separation of both hands or both feet or the
total sight of both eyes or any two (2) such losses in the same
accident, one hundred (100) degrees of permanent impairment.
(5) For the permanent and complete loss of vision by enucleation,
thirty-five (35) degrees of permanent impairment.
(6) For the permanent and complete loss of hearing in one (1) ear,
fifteen (15) degrees of permanent impairment, and in both ears,
forty (40) degrees of permanent impairment.
(7) For the loss of one (1) testicle, ten (10) degrees of permanent
impairment; for the loss of both testicles, thirty (30) degrees of
permanent impairment.
(8) Loss of use: The total permanent loss of the use of an arm, a
hand, a thumb, a finger, a leg, a foot, a toe, or a phalange shall be
considered as the equivalent of the loss by separation of the arm,
hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange, and compensation
shall be paid in the same amount as for the loss by separation.
However, the doubling provision of subdivision (2) does not
apply to a loss of use that is not a loss by separation.
(9) Partial loss of use: For the permanent partial loss of the use of
an arm, a hand, a thumb, a finger, a leg, a foot, a toe, or a
phalange, compensation shall be paid for the proportionate loss of
the use of the arm, hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange.
(10) For injuries resulting in total permanent disability, the
amount payable for impairment or five hundred (500) weeks of
compensation, whichever is greater.
(11) Visual impairments shall be based on the Functional Vision
Score (FVS) assessing the visual acuity and visual field to
evaluate any reduction in ability to perform vision-related
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


Activities of Daily Living (ADL). Unless such loss is otherwise
specified in subdivision (5), visual impairments shall be paid as
a whole person rating.
(12) For any permanent reduction of the hearing of one (1) or both
ears, less than the total loss as specified in subsection (e)(5),
compensation shall be paid in an amount proportionate to the
degree of a permanent reduction.
(13) In all other cases of permanent partial impairment,
compensation proportionate to the degree of a permanent partial
impairment, in the discretion of the worker's compensation board,
not exceeding one hundred (100) degrees of permanent
impairment.
(14) In all cases of permanent disfigurement which may impair
the future usefulness or opportunities of the employee,
compensation, in the discretion of the worker's compensation
board, not exceeding forty (40) degrees of permanent impairment
except that no compensation shall be payable under this
subdivision where compensation is payable elsewhere in this
section.
(g) Compensation for permanent partial impairment shall be paid
according to the degree of permanent impairment for the injury
determined under subsection (f) and the following:
(1) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2010,
and before July 1, 2014, for each degree of permanent impairment
from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand four hundred dollars
($1,400) per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment
from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one thousand six hundred
dollars ($1,600) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), two thousand seven
hundred dollars ($2,700) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), three thousand five
hundred dollars ($3,500) per degree.
(2) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2014,
and before July 1, 2015, for each degree of permanent impairment
from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand five hundred seventeen
dollars ($1,517) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one thousand
seven hundred seventeen dollars ($1,717) per degree; for each
degree of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50),
two thousand eight hundred sixty-two dollars ($2,862) per degree;
for each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), three
thousand six hundred eighty-seven dollars ($3,687) per degree.
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(3) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2015,
and before July 1, 2016, for each degree of permanent impairment
from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand six hundred thirty-three
dollars ($1,633) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one thousand
eight hundred thirty-five dollars ($1,835) per degree; for each
degree of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50),
three thousand twenty-four dollars ($3,024) per degree; for each
degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), three thousand
eight hundred seventy-three dollars ($3,873) per degree.
(4) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2016,
and before July 1, 2023, for each degree of permanent impairment
from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($1,750) per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment
from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one thousand nine hundred
fifty-two dollars ($1,952) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand one hundred eighty-six dollars ($3,186) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four
thousand sixty dollars ($4,060) per degree.
(5) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2023,
and before July 1, 2024, for each degree of permanent impairment
from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand eight hundred three dollars
($1,803) per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment
from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand eleven dollars
($2,011) per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment
from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three thousand two hundred
eighty-two dollars ($3,282) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), four thousand one
hundred eighty-two dollars ($4,182) per degree.
(6) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2024,
and before July 1, 2025, for each degree of permanent impairment
from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand eight hundred fifty-seven
dollars ($1,857) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand
seventy-one dollars ($2,071) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand three hundred eighty dollars ($3,380) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four
thousand three hundred seven dollars ($4,307) per degree.
(7) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2025,
and before July 1, 2026, for each degree of permanent impairment
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand nine hundred thirteen
dollars ($1,913) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand one
hundred thirty-three dollars ($2,133) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand four hundred eighty-one dollars ($3,481) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four
thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars ($4,436) per degree.
(8) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2026,
and before July 1, 2027, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand nine hundred
seventy dollars ($1,970) two thousand one hundred four
dollars ($2,104) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand one
hundred ninety-seven dollars ($2,197) two thousand three
hundred forty-six dollars ($2,346) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand five hundred eighty-five dollars ($3,585) three
thousand eight hundred twenty-nine dollars ($3,829) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50),
four thousand five hundred sixty-nine dollars ($4,569) four
thousand eight hundred eighty dollars ($4,880) per degree.
(9) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2027, and before July 1, 2028, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand two
hundred thirty dollars ($2,230) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand four hundred eighty-seven dollars ($2,487) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand fifty-nine dollars
($4,059) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment above fifty (50), five thousand one hundred
seventy-three dollars ($5,173) per degree.
(10) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2028, and before July 1, 2029, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand three
hundred nineteen dollars ($2,319) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars ($2,586) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand two hundred
twenty-one dollars ($4,221) per degree; for each degree of
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


permanent impairment above fifty (50), five thousand three
hundred eighty dollars ($5,380) per degree.
(11) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2029, and before July 1, 2030, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand four
hundred twelve dollars ($2,412) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand six hundred eighty-nine dollars ($2,689) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand three hundred
ninety dollars ($4,390) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), five thousand five
hundred ninety-five dollars ($5,595) per degree.
(12) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2030, and before July 1, 2031, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand five
hundred eight dollars ($2,508) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand seven hundred ninety-seven dollars ($2,797) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand five hundred
sixty-six dollars ($4,566) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), five thousand eight
hundred nineteen dollars ($5,819) per degree.
(13) With respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2031, for each degree of permanent impairment from one (1)
to ten (10), two thousand six hundred eight dollars ($2,608)
per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand nine hundred nine
dollars ($2,909) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand
seven hundred forty-nine dollars ($4,749) per degree; for each
degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), six
thousand fifty-two dollars ($6,052) per degree.
(h) The average weekly wages used in the determination of
compensation for permanent partial impairment under subsections (f)
and (g) shall not exceed the following:
(1) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2009, and
before July 1, 2014, nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($975).
(2) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2014, and
before July 1, 2015, one thousand forty dollars ($1,040).
(3) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2015, and
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


before July 1, 2016, one thousand one hundred five dollars
($1,105).
(4) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2016, and
before July 1, 2023, one thousand one hundred seventy dollars
($1,170).
(5) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2023, and
before July 1, 2024, one thousand two hundred five dollars
($1,205).
(6) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2024, and
before July 1, 2025, one thousand two hundred forty-one dollars
($1,241).
(7) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2025, and
before July 1, 2026, one thousand two hundred seventy-eight
dollars ($1,278).
(8) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2026, and
before July 1, 2027, one thousand three hundred sixteen dollars
($1,316). one thousand four hundred six dollars ($1,406).
(9) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2027,
and before July 1, 2028, one thousand four hundred ninety
dollars ($1,490).
(10) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1,
2028, and before July 1, 2029, one thousand five hundred fifty
dollars ($1,550).
(11) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1,
2029, and before July 1, 2030, one thousand six hundred
twelve dollars ($1,612).
(12) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1,
2030, and before July 1, 2031, one thousand six hundred
seventy-six dollars ($1,676).
(13) With respect to injuries occurring on or after July 1,
2031, one thousand seven hundred forty-three dollars
($1,743).
SECTION 5. IC 22-3-3-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) In computing compensation for temporary
total disability, temporary partial disability, and total permanent
disability, the average weekly wages are considered to be:
(1) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2009,
and before July 1, 2014:
(A) not more than nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($975);
and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(2) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2014,
and before July 1, 2015:
(A) not more than one thousand forty dollars ($1,040); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(3) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2015,
and before July 1, 2016:
(A) not more than one thousand one hundred five dollars
($1,105); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(4) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2016,
and before July 1, 2023:
(A) not more than one thousand one hundred seventy dollars
($1,170); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(5) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2023,
and before July 1, 2024:
(A) not more than one thousand two hundred five dollars
($1,205); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(6) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2024,
and before July 1, 2025:
(A) not more than one thousand two hundred forty-one dollars
($1,241); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(7) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2025,
and before July 1, 2026:
(A) not more than one thousand two hundred seventy-eight
dollars ($1,278); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75); and
(8) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1, 2026,
and before July 1, 2027:
(A) not more than one thousand three hundred sixteen dollars
($1,316); one thousand four hundred six dollars ($1,406);
and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(9) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2027, and before July 1, 2028:
(A) not more than one thousand four hundred ninety
dollars ($1,490); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(10) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2028, and before July 1, 2029:
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(A) not more than one thousand five hundred fifty dollars
($1,550); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(11) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2029, and before July 1, 2030:
(A) not more than one thousand six hundred twelve dollars
($1,612); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(12) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2030, and before July 1, 2031:
(A) not more than one thousand six hundred seventy-six
dollars ($1,676); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75); and
(13) with respect to injuries occurring on and after July 1,
2031:
(A) not more than one thousand seven hundred forty-three
dollars ($1,743); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75).
However, the weekly compensation payable shall not exceed the
average weekly wages of the employee at the time of the injury.
(b) The maximum compensation, exclusive of medical benefits, that
may be paid for an injury under any provision of this law or any
combination of provisions may not exceed the following amounts in
any case:
(1) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2009,
and before July 1, 2014, three hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($325,000).
(2) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2014,
and before July 1, 2015, three hundred forty-seven thousand
dollars ($347,000).
(3) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2015,
and before July 1, 2016, three hundred sixty-eight thousand
dollars ($368,000).
(4) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2016,
and before July 1, 2023, three hundred ninety thousand dollars
($390,000).
(5) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2023,
and before July 1, 2024, four hundred two thousand dollars
($402,000).
(6) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2024,
and before July 1, 2025, four hundred fourteen thousand dollars
($414,000).
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(7) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2025,
and before July 1, 2026, four hundred twenty-six thousand dollars
($426,000).
(8) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 2026,
and before July 1, 2027, four hundred thirty-nine thousand
dollars ($439,000). four hundred sixty-eight thousand dollars
($468,000).
(9) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1,
2027, and before July 1, 2028, four hundred ninety-six
thousand dollars ($496,000).
(10) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1,
2028, and before July 1, 2029, five hundred sixteen thousand
dollars ($516,000).
(11) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1,
2029, and before July 1, 2030, five hundred thirty-seven
thousand dollars ($537,000).
(12) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1,
2030, and before July 1, 2031, five hundred fifty-eight
thousand dollars ($558,000).
(13) With respect to an injury occurring on and after July 1,
2031, five hundred eighty-one thousand dollars ($581,000).
SECTION 6. IC 22-3-7-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2022,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Compensation shall be allowed on account
of disablement from occupational disease resulting in only temporary
total disability to work or temporary partial disability to work
beginning with the eighth day of such disability except for the medical
benefits provided for in section 17 of this chapter. Compensation shall
be allowed for the first seven (7) calendar days only as provided in this
section. The first weekly installment of compensation for temporary
disability is due fourteen (14) days after the disability begins. Not later
than fourteen (14) days from the date that the first installment of
compensation is due, the employer or the employer's insurance carrier
shall file a report of payment of compensation with the worker's
compensation board electronically and tender to the employee or to the
employee's dependents, with all compensation due, a properly prepared
compensation agreement in a form prescribed by the board. The
presentation to the employee or to the employee's dependents of the
check, draft, or electronic payment from the employer or the employer's
insurance carrier for the proper amount, drawn upon a bank in which
money is on deposit to pay the same on demand, shall be sufficient
tender of the compensation.
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(b) Whenever an employer or the employer's insurance carrier
denies or is not able to determine liability to pay compensation or
benefits, the employer or the employer's insurance carrier shall notify
the worker's compensation board and the employee in writing on a form
prescribed by the worker's compensation board not later than thirty (30)
days after the employer's knowledge of the claimed disablement. If a
determination of liability cannot be made within thirty (30) days, the
worker's compensation board may approve an additional thirty (30)
days upon a written request of the employer or the employer's insurance
carrier that sets forth the reasons that the determination could not be
made within thirty (30) days and states the facts or circumstances that
are necessary to determine liability within the additional thirty (30)
days. More than thirty (30) days of additional time may be approved by
the worker's compensation board upon the filing of a petition by the
employer or the employer's insurance carrier that sets forth:
(1) the extraordinary circumstances that have precluded a
determination of liability within the initial sixty (60) days;
(2) the status of the investigation on the date the petition is filed;
(3) the facts or circumstances that are necessary to make a
determination; and
(4) a timetable for the completion of the remaining investigation.
An employer who fails to comply with this section is subject to a civil
penalty under IC 22-3-4-15.
(c) Once begun, temporary total disability benefits may not be
terminated by the employer unless:
(1) the employee has returned to work;
(2) the employee has died;
(3) the employee has refused to undergo a medical examination
under section 20 of this chapter;
(4) the employee has received five hundred (500) weeks of
temporary total disability benefits or has been paid the maximum
compensation allowable under section 19 of this chapter; or
(5) the employee is unable or unavailable to work for reasons
unrelated to the compensable disease.
In each instance, the employer must provide written notice to the
injured worker on a form approved by the board. In all other cases the
employer must notify the employee in writing of the employer's intent
to terminate the payment of temporary total disability benefits, and of
the availability of employment, if any, on a form approved by the
board. In all instances, the employer must file an electronic notice of
the termination with the board.
(d) If the employee disagrees with the termination or proposed
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


termination, the employee must give written notice of disagreement to
the board and the employer within seven (7) days after receipt of the
notice of intent to terminate benefits. If the board and employer do not
receive a notice of disagreement under this section, the employee's
temporary total disability benefits shall be terminated. Upon receipt of
the notice of disagreement, the board shall immediately contact the
parties, which may be by telephone or other means and attempt to
resolve the disagreement. If the board is unable to resolve the
disagreement within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice of
disagreement, the board shall immediately arrange for an evaluation of
the employee by an independent medical examiner. The independent
medical examiner shall be selected by mutual agreement of the parties
or, if the parties are unable to agree, appointed by the board under
IC 22-3-4-11. If the independent medical examiner determines that the
employee is no longer temporarily disabled or is still temporarily
disabled but can return to employment that the employer has made
available to the employee, or if the employee fails or refuses to appear
for examination by the independent medical examiner, temporary total
disability benefits may be terminated. If either party disagrees with the
opinion of the independent medical examiner, the party shall apply to
the board for a hearing under section 27 of this chapter.
(e) An employer is not required to continue the payment of
temporary total disability benefits for more than fourteen (14) days
after the employer's proposed termination date unless the independent
medical examiner determines that the employee is temporarily disabled
and unable to return to any employment that the employer has made
available to the employee.
(f) If it is determined that as a result of this section temporary total
disability benefits were overpaid, the overpayment shall be deducted
from any benefits due the employee under this section and, if there are
no benefits due the employee or the benefits due the employee do not
equal the amount of the overpayment, the employee shall be
responsible for paying any overpayment which cannot be deducted
from benefits due the employee.
(g) For disablements occurring on and after July 1, 1976, from
occupational disease resulting in temporary total disability for any work
there shall be paid to the disabled employee during the temporary total
disability weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds
percent (66 2/3%) of the employee's average weekly wages, as defined
in section 19 of this chapter, for a period not to exceed five hundred
(500) weeks. Compensation shall be allowed for the first seven (7)
calendar days only if the disability continues for longer than twenty-one
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(21) days.
(h) For disablements occurring on and after July 1, 1974, from
occupational disease resulting in temporary partial disability for work
there shall be paid to the disabled employee during such disability a
weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66
2/3%) of the difference between the employee's average weekly wages,
as defined in section 19 of this chapter, and the weekly wages at which
the employee is actually employed after the disablement, for a period
not to exceed three hundred (300) weeks. Compensation shall be
allowed for the first seven (7) calendar days only if the disability
continues for longer than twenty-one (21) days. In case of partial
disability after the period of temporary total disability, the latter period
shall be included as a part of the maximum period allowed for partial
disability.
(i) With respect to disablements in the following schedule occurring
on and after July 1, 1991, the employee shall receive in addition to
temporary total disability benefits, not exceeding one hundred
twenty-five (125) weeks on account of the disablement, compensation
in an amount determined under the following schedule to be paid
weekly at a rate of sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) of the
employee's average weekly wages during the fifty-two (52) weeks
immediately preceding the week in which the disablement occurred:
(1) Amputation: For the loss by separation of the thumb, twelve
(12) degrees of permanent impairment; of the index finger, eight
(8) degrees of permanent impairment; of the second finger, seven
(7) degrees of permanent impairment; of the third or ring finger,
six (6) degrees of permanent impairment; of the fourth or little
finger, four (4) degrees of permanent impairment; of the hand by
separation below the elbow joint, forty (40) degrees of permanent
impairment; of the arm above the elbow, fifty (50) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the big toe, twelve (12) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the second toe, six (6) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the third toe, four (4) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the fourth toe, three (3) degrees of
permanent impairment; of the fifth or little toe, two (2) degrees of
permanent impairment; of separation of the foot below the knee
joint, thirty-five (35) degrees of permanent impairment; and of the
leg above the knee joint, forty-five (45) degrees of permanent
impairment.
(2) Amputations occurring on or after July 1, 1997: For the loss
by separation of any of the body parts described in subdivision (1)
on or after July 1, 1997, the dollar values per degree applying on
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


the date of the injury as described in subsection (j) shall be
multiplied by two (2). However, the doubling provision of this
subdivision does not apply to a loss of use that is not a loss by
separation.
(3) The loss of more than one (1) phalange of a thumb or toe shall
be considered as the loss of the entire thumb or toe. The loss of
more than two (2) phalanges of a finger shall be considered as the
loss of the entire finger. The loss of not more than one (1)
phalange of a thumb or toe shall be considered as the loss of
one-half (1/2) of the degrees of permanent impairment for the loss
of the entire thumb or toe. The loss of not more than one (1)
phalange of a finger shall be considered as the loss of one-third
(1/3) of the finger and compensation shall be paid for one-third
(1/3) of the degrees payable for the loss of the entire finger. The
loss of more than one (1) phalange of the finger but not more than
two (2) phalanges of the finger shall be considered as the loss of
one-half (1/2) of the finger and compensation shall be paid for
one-half (1/2) of the degrees payable for the loss of the entire
finger.
(4) For the loss by separation of both hands or both feet or the
total sight of both eyes or any two (2) such losses in the same
accident, one hundred (100) degrees of permanent impairment.
(5) For the permanent and complete loss of vision by enucleation
or its reduction to one-tenth (1/10) of normal vision with glasses,
thirty-five (35) degrees of permanent impairment.
(6) For the permanent and complete loss of hearing in one (1) ear,
fifteen (15) degrees of permanent impairment, and in both ears,
forty (40) degrees of permanent impairment.
(7) For the loss of one (1) testicle, ten (10) degrees of permanent
impairment; for the loss of both testicles, thirty (30) degrees of
permanent impairment.
(8) Loss of use: The total permanent loss of the use of an arm, a
hand, a thumb, a finger, a leg, a foot, a toe, or a phalange shall be
considered as the equivalent of the loss by separation of the arm,
hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange, and compensation
shall be paid in the same amount as for the loss by separation.
However, the doubling provision of subdivision (2) does not
apply to a loss of use that is not a loss by separation.
(9) Partial loss of use: For the permanent partial loss of the use of
an arm, a hand, a thumb, a finger, a leg, a foot, a toe, or a
phalange, compensation shall be paid for the proportionate loss of
the use of the arm, hand, thumb, finger, leg, foot, toe, or phalange.
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(10) For disablements resulting in total permanent disability, the
amount payable for impairment or five hundred (500) weeks of
compensation, whichever is greater.
(11) Visual impairments shall be based on the Functional Vision
Score (FVS) assessing the visual acuity and visual field to
evaluate any reduction in ability to perform vision-related
Activities of Daily Living (ADL). Unless such loss is otherwise
specified in subdivision (5), visual impairments shall be paid as
a whole person rating.
(12) For any permanent reduction of the hearing of one (1) or both
ears, less than the total loss as specified in subdivision (6),
compensation shall be paid in an amount proportionate to the
degree of a permanent reduction.
(13) In all other cases of permanent partial impairment,
compensation proportionate to the degree of a permanent partial
impairment, in the discretion of the worker's compensation board,
not exceeding one hundred (100) degrees of permanent
impairment.
(14) In all cases of permanent disfigurement which may impair
the future usefulness or opportunities of the employee,
compensation, in the discretion of the worker's compensation
board, not exceeding forty (40) degrees of permanent impairment
except that no compensation shall be payable under this
subdivision where compensation is payable elsewhere in this
section.
(j) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1, 1991,
compensation for permanent partial impairment shall be paid according
to the degree of permanent impairment for the disablement determined
under subsection (i) and the following:
(1) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2010, and before July 1, 2014, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand four hundred
dollars ($1,400) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one thousand six
hundred dollars ($1,600) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), two
thousand seven hundred dollars ($2,700) per degree; for each
degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), three thousand
five hundred dollars ($3,500) per degree.
(2) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2014, and before July 1, 2015, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand five hundred
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


seventeen dollars ($1,517) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one
thousand seven hundred seventeen dollars ($1,717) per degree;
for each degree of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to
fifty (50), two thousand eight hundred sixty-two dollars ($2,862)
per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment above fifty
(50), three thousand six hundred eighty-seven dollars ($3,687) per
degree.
(3) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2015, and before July 1, 2016, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand six hundred
thirty-three dollars ($1,633) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one
thousand eight hundred thirty-five dollars ($1,835) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty
(50), three thousand twenty-four dollars ($3,024) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), three
thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars ($3,873) per degree.
(4) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2016, and before July 1, 2023, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars ($1,750) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), one thousand nine
hundred fifty-two dollars ($1,952) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand one hundred eighty-six dollars ($3,186) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four
thousand sixty dollars ($4,060) per degree.
(5) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2023, and before July 1, 2024, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand eight hundred
three dollars ($1,803) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand
eleven dollars ($2,011) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three thousand two
hundred eighty-two dollars ($3,282) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four thousand one
hundred eighty-two dollars ($4,182) per degree.
(6) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2024, and before July 1, 2025, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand eight hundred
fifty-seven dollars ($1,857) per degree; for each degree of
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two
thousand seventy-one dollars ($2,071) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand three hundred eighty dollars ($3,380) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four
thousand three hundred seven dollars ($4,307) per degree.
(7) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2025, and before July 1, 2026, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand nine hundred
thirteen dollars ($1,913) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand one
hundred thirty-three dollars ($2,133) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand four hundred eighty-one dollars ($3,481) per degree; for
each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), four
thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars ($4,436) per degree.
(8) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2026, and before July 1, 2027, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), one thousand nine hundred
seventy dollars ($1,970) two thousand one hundred four
dollars ($2,104) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand one
hundred ninety-seven dollars ($2,197) two thousand three
hundred forty-six dollars ($2,346) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), three
thousand five hundred eighty-five dollars ($3,585) three
thousand eight hundred twenty-nine dollars ($3,829) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50),
four thousand five hundred sixty-nine dollars ($4,569) four
thousand eight hundred eighty dollars ($4,880) per degree.
(9) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2027, and before July 1, 2028, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand two
hundred thirty dollars ($2,230) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand four hundred eighty-seven dollars ($2,487) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand fifty-nine dollars
($4,059) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment above fifty (50), five thousand one hundred
seventy-three dollars ($5,173) per degree.
(10) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


1, 2028, and before July 1, 2029, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand three
hundred nineteen dollars ($2,319) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars ($2,586) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand two hundred
twenty-one dollars ($4,221) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), five thousand three
hundred eighty dollars ($5,380) per degree.
(11) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2029, and before July 1, 2030, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand four
hundred twelve dollars ($2,412) per degree; for each degree
of permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand six hundred eighty-nine dollars ($2,689) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand three hundred
ninety dollars ($4,390) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), five thousand five
hundred ninety-five dollars ($5,595) per degree.
(12) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2030, and before July 1, 2031, for each degree of permanent
impairment from one (1) to ten (10), two thousand five
hundred eight dollars ($2,508) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment from eleven (11) to thirty-five (35),
two thousand seven hundred ninety-seven dollars ($2,797) per
degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand five hundred
sixty-six dollars ($4,566) per degree; for each degree of
permanent impairment above fifty (50), five thousand eight
hundred nineteen dollars ($5,819) per degree.
(13) With respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2031, for each degree of permanent impairment from one
(1) to ten (10), two thousand six hundred eight dollars ($2,608)
per degree; for each degree of permanent impairment from
eleven (11) to thirty-five (35), two thousand nine hundred nine
dollars ($2,909) per degree; for each degree of permanent
impairment from thirty-six (36) to fifty (50), four thousand
seven hundred forty-nine dollars ($4,749) per degree; for each
degree of permanent impairment above fifty (50), six
thousand fifty-two dollars ($6,052) per degree.
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(k) The average weekly wages used in the determination of
compensation for permanent partial impairment under subsections (i)
and (j) shall not exceed the following:
(1) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2009, and before July 1, 2014, nine hundred seventy-five dollars
($975).
(2) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2014, and before July 1, 2015, one thousand forty dollars
($1,040).
(3) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2015, and before July 1, 2016, one thousand one hundred five
dollars ($1,105).
(4) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2016, and before July 1, 2023, one thousand one hundred seventy
dollars ($1,170).
(5) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2023, and before July 1, 2024, one thousand two hundred five
dollars ($1,205).
(6) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2024, and before July 1, 2025, one thousand two hundred
forty-one dollars ($1,241).
(7) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2025, and before July 1, 2026, one thousand two hundred
seventy-eight dollars ($1,278).
(8) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2026, and before July 1, 2027, one thousand three hundred
sixteen dollars ($1,316). one thousand four hundred six dollars
($1,406).
(9) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July 1,
2027, and before July 1, 2028, one thousand four hundred
ninety dollars ($1,490).
(10) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July
1, 2028, and before July 1, 2029, one thousand five hundred
fifty dollars ($1,550).
(11) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July
1, 2029, and before July 1, 2030, one thousand six hundred
twelve dollars ($1,612).
(12) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July
1, 2030, and before July 1, 2031, one thousand six hundred
seventy-six dollars ($1,676).
(13) With respect to disablements occurring on or after July
1, 2031, one thousand seven hundred forty-three dollars
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


($1,743).
(l) If any employee, only partially disabled, refuses employment
suitable to the employee's capacity procured for the employee, the
employee shall not be entitled to any compensation at any time during
the continuance of such refusal unless, in the opinion of the worker's
compensation board, such refusal was justifiable. The employee must
be served with a notice setting forth the consequences of the refusal
under this subsection. The notice must be in a form prescribed by the
worker's compensation board.
(m) If an employee has sustained a permanent impairment or
disability from an accidental injury other than an occupational disease
in another employment than that in which the employee suffered a
subsequent disability from an occupational disease, such as herein
specified, the employee shall be entitled to compensation for the
subsequent disability in the same amount as if the previous impairment
or disability had not occurred. However, if the permanent impairment
or disability resulting from an occupational disease for which
compensation is claimed results only in the aggravation or increase of
a previously sustained permanent impairment from an occupational
disease or physical condition regardless of the source or cause of such
previously sustained impairment from an occupational disease or
physical condition, the board shall determine the extent of the
previously sustained permanent impairment from an occupational
disease or physical condition as well as the extent of the aggravation or
increase resulting from the subsequent permanent impairment or
disability, and shall award compensation only for that part of said
occupational disease or physical condition resulting from the
subsequent permanent impairment. An amputation of any part of the
body or loss of any or all of the vision of one (1) or both eyes caused by
an occupational disease shall be considered as a permanent impairment
or physical condition.
(n) If an employee suffers a disablement from an occupational
disease for which compensation is payable while the employee is still
receiving or entitled to compensation for a previous injury by accident
or disability by occupational disease in the same employment, the
employee shall not at the same time be entitled to compensation for
both, unless it be for a permanent injury, such as specified in
subsection (i)(1), (i)(4), (i)(5), (i)(8), or (i)(9), but the employee shall
be entitled to compensation for that disability and from the time of that
disability which will cover the longest period and the largest amount
payable under this chapter.
(o) If an employee receives a permanent disability from an
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


occupational disease such as specified in subsection (i)(1), (i)(4), (i)(5),
(i)(8), or (i)(9) after having sustained another such permanent disability
in the same employment the employee shall be entitled to
compensation for both such disabilities, but the total compensation
shall be paid by extending the period and not by increasing the amount
of weekly compensation and, when such previous and subsequent
permanent disabilities, in combination result in total permanent
disability or permanent total impairment, compensation shall be
payable for such permanent total disability or impairment, but
payments made for the previous disability or impairment shall be
deducted from the total payment of compensation due.
(p) When an employee has been awarded or is entitled to an award
of compensation for a definite period from an occupational disease
wherein disablement occurs on and after April 1, 1963, and such
employee dies from other causes than such occupational disease,
payment of the unpaid balance of such compensation not exceeding
three hundred fifty (350) weeks shall be paid to the employee's
dependents of the second and third class as defined in sections 11
through 14 of this chapter and compensation, not exceeding five
hundred (500) weeks shall be made to the employee's dependents of the
first class as defined in sections 11 through 14 of this chapter.
(q) Any payment made by the employer to the employee during the
period of the employee's disability, or to the employee's dependents,
which, by the terms of this chapter, was not due and payable when
made, may, subject to the approval of the worker's compensation board,
be deducted from the amount to be paid as compensation, but such
deduction shall be made from the distal end of the period during which
compensation must be paid, except in cases of temporary disability.
(r) When so provided in the compensation agreement or in the
award of the worker's compensation board, compensation may be paid
semimonthly, or monthly, instead of weekly.
(s) When the aggregate payments of compensation awarded by
agreement or upon hearing to an employee or dependent under eighteen
(18) years of age do not exceed one hundred dollars ($100), the
payment thereof may be made directly to such employee or dependent,
except when the worker's compensation board shall order otherwise.
(t) Whenever the aggregate payments of compensation, due to any
person under eighteen (18) years of age, exceed one hundred dollars
($100), the payment thereof shall be made to a trustee, appointed by the
circuit or superior court, or to a duly qualified guardian, or, upon the
order of the worker's compensation board, to a parent or to such minor
person. The payment of compensation, due to any person eighteen (18)
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


years of age or over, may be made directly to such person.
(u) If an employee, or a dependent, is mentally incompetent, or a
minor at the time when any right or privilege accrues to the employee
under this chapter, the employee's guardian or trustee may, in the
employee's behalf, claim and exercise such right and privilege.
(v) All compensation payments named and provided for in this
section, shall mean and be defined to be for only such occupational
diseases and disabilities therefrom as are proved by competent
evidence, of which there are or have been objective conditions or
symptoms proven, not within the physical or mental control of the
employee.
SECTION 7. IC 22-3-7-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2022,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) In computing compensation for temporary
total disability, temporary partial disability, and total permanent
disability, the average weekly wages are considered to be:
(1) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2009, and before July 1, 2014:
(A) not more than nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($975);
and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(2) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2014, and before July 1, 2015:
(A) not more than one thousand forty dollars ($1,040); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(3) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2015, and before July 1, 2016:
(A) not more than one thousand one hundred five dollars
($1,105); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(4) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2016, and before July 1, 2023:
(A) not more than one thousand one hundred seventy dollars
($1,170); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(5) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2023, and before July 1, 2024:
(A) not more than one thousand two hundred five dollars
($1,205); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(6) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2024, and before July 1, 2025:
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(A) not more than one thousand two hundred forty-one dollars
($1,241); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(7) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2025, and before July 1, 2026:
(A) not more than one thousand two hundred seventy-eight
dollars ($1,278); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75); and
(8) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July 1,
2026, and before July 1, 2027:
(A) not more than one thousand three hundred sixteen dollars
($1,316); one thousand four hundred six dollars ($1,406);
and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(9) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2027, and before July 1, 2028:
(A) not more than one thousand four hundred ninety
dollars ($1,490); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(10) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2028, and before July 1, 2029:
(A) not more than one thousand five hundred fifty dollars
($1,550); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(11) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2029, and before July 1, 2030:
(A) not more than one thousand six hundred twelve dollars
($1,612); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75);
(12) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2030, and before July 1, 2031:
(A) not more than one thousand six hundred seventy-six
dollars ($1,676); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75); and
(13) with respect to disablements occurring on and after July
1, 2031:
(A) not more than one thousand seven hundred forty-three
dollars ($1,743); and
(B) not less than seventy-five dollars ($75).
(b) The maximum compensation that shall be paid for occupational
disease and the results of an occupational disease under this chapter or
under any combination of the provisions of this chapter may not exceed
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


the following amounts in any case:
(1) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2009, and before July 1, 2014, three hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars ($325,000).
(2) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2014, and before July 1, 2015, three hundred forty-seven
thousand dollars ($347,000).
(3) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2015, and before July 1, 2016, three hundred sixty-eight
thousand dollars ($368,000).
(4) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2016, and before July 1, 2023, three hundred ninety thousand
dollars ($390,000).
(5) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2023, and before July 1, 2024, four hundred two thousand
dollars ($402,000).
(6) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2024, and before July 1, 2025, four hundred fourteen thousand
dollars ($414,000).
(7) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2025, and before July 1, 2026, four hundred twenty-six
thousand dollars ($426,000).
(8) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after July
1, 2026, and before July 1, 2027, four hundred thirty-nine
thousand dollars ($439,000). four hundred sixty-eight thousand
dollars ($468,000).
(9) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after
July 1, 2027, and before July 1, 2028, four hundred ninety-six
thousand dollars ($496,000).
(10) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after
July 1, 2028, and before July 1, 2029, five hundred sixteen
thousand dollars ($516,000).
(11) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after
July 1, 2029, and before July 1, 2030, five hundred
thirty-seven thousand dollars ($537,000).
(12) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after
July 1, 2030, and before July 1, 2031, five hundred fifty-eight
thousand dollars ($558,000).
(13) With respect to disability or death occurring on and after
July 1, 2031, five hundred eighty-one thousand dollars
($581,000).
(c) For all disabilities occurring on and after July 1, 1985, "average
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


weekly wages" means the earnings of the injured employee during the
period of fifty-two (52) weeks immediately preceding the disability
divided by fifty-two (52). If the employee lost seven (7) or more
calendar days during the period, although not in the same week, then
the earnings for the remainder of the fifty-two (52) weeks shall be
divided by the number of weeks and parts of weeks remaining after the
time lost has been deducted. If employment before the date of disability
extended over a period of less than fifty-two (52) weeks, the method of
dividing the earnings during that period by the number of weeks and
parts of weeks during which the employee earned wages shall be
followed if results just and fair to both parties will be obtained. If by
reason of the shortness of the time during which the employee has been
in the employment of the employer or of the casual nature or terms of
the employment it is impracticable to compute the average weekly
wages for the employee, the employee's average weekly wages shall be
considered to be the average weekly amount that, during the fifty-two
(52) weeks before the date of disability, was being earned by a person
in the same grade employed at the same work by the same employer or,
if there is no person so employed, by a person in the same grade
employed in that same class of employment in the same district.
Whenever allowances of any character are made to an employee
instead of wages or a specified part of the wage contract, they shall be
considered a part of the employee's earnings.
(d) The provisions of this article may not be construed to result in
an award of benefits in which the number of weeks paid or to be paid
for temporary total disability, temporary partial disability, or permanent
total disability benefits combined exceeds five hundred (500) weeks.
This section shall not be construed to prevent a person from applying
for an award under IC 22-3-3-13. However, in case of permanent total
disability resulting from a disablement occurring on or after January 1,
1998, the minimum total benefit shall not be less than seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000).
SECTION 8. IC 22-4-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.122-2019,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) For calendar quarters beginning on and after
July 1, 1997, and before July 1, 1998, "wage credits" means
remuneration paid for employment by an employer to an individual and
remuneration received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections
3102 and 3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may
not exceed five thousand four hundred dollars ($5,400) and may not
include payments specified in section 2 of this chapter.
(b) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 1998, and
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


before July 1, 1999, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600) and may not include
payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under section
2 of this chapter.
(c) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 1999, and
before July 1, 2000, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed five thousand eight hundred dollars ($5,800) and may not
include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under
section 2 of this chapter.
(d) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2000, and
before July 1, 2001, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed six thousand seven hundred dollars ($6,700) and may not
include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under
section 2 of this chapter.
(e) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2001, and
before July 1, 2002, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed seven thousand three hundred dollars ($7,300) and may not
include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under
section 2 of this chapter.
(f) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2002, and
before July 1, 2003, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed seven thousand nine hundred dollars ($7,900) and may not
include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under
section 2 of this chapter.
(g) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2003, and
before July 1, 2004, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed eight thousand two hundred sixteen dollars ($8,216) and may
not include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages
under section 2 of this chapter.
(h) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2004, and
before July 1, 2005, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed eight thousand seven hundred thirty-three dollars ($8,733) and
may not include payments that are excluded from the definition of
wages under section 2 of this chapter.
(i) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2005, and
before July 1, 2012, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
exceed nine thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($9,250) and may not
include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under
section 2 of this chapter.
(j) For calendar quarters beginning on and after July 1, 2012, and
before July 1, 2026, "wage credits" means remuneration paid for
employment by an employer to an individual and remuneration
received as tips or gratuities in accordance with Sections 3102 and
3301 et seq. of the Internal Revenue Code. Wage credits may not
include payments that are excluded from the definition of wages under
section 2 of this chapter.
(k) For calendar quarters beginning after June 30, 2026, "wage
credits" means remuneration paid for employment by an employer
to an individual and remuneration received as tips or gratuities in
accordance with Sections 3102 and 3301 et seq. of the Internal
Revenue Code. Wage credits may not exceed twelve thousand three
hundred fifty dollars ($12,350) and may not include payments that
are excluded from the definition of wages under section 2 of this
chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 22-4-12-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2011,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) With respect to initial claims filed for any
week beginning on and after July 1, 1997, and before July 1, 2012,
each eligible individual who is totally unemployed (as defined in
IC 22-4-3-1) in any week in the individual's benefit period shall be paid
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


for the week, if properly claimed, benefits at the rate of:
(1) five percent (5%) of the first two thousand dollars ($2,000) of
the individual's wage credits in the calendar quarter during the
individual's base period in which the wage credits were highest;
and
(2) four percent (4%) of the individual's remaining wage credits
in the calendar quarter during the individual's base period in
which the wage credits were highest.
(a) For purposes of this section, "prior average weekly wage"
means the result of:
(1) the individual's total wage credits during the individual's
base period; divided by
(2) fifty-two (52).
(b) With respect to initial claims filed for any week beginning on
and after July 1, 2012, and before July 1, 2026, each eligible
individual who is totally unemployed (as defined in IC 22-4-3-1) in any
week in the individual's benefit period shall be paid for the week, if
properly claimed, an amount equal to forty-seven percent (47%) of the
individual's prior average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a
multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next lower dollar. However, the
maximum weekly benefit amount may not exceed three hundred ninety
dollars ($390).
(c) For purposes of this section, "prior average weekly wage" means
the result of:
(1) the individual's total wage credits during the individual's base
period; divided by
(2) fifty-two (52).
(c) With respect to initial claims filed for any week beginning
after June 30, 2026, each eligible individual who is totally
unemployed (as defined in IC 22-4-3-1) in any week in the
individual's benefit period shall be paid for the week, if properly
claimed, benefits at the rate of:
(1) five percent (5%) of the first two thousand dollars ($2,000)
of the individual's wage credits in the calendar quarter during
the individual's base period in which the wage credits were
highest; and
(2) four percent (4%) of the individual's remaining wage
credits in the calendar quarter during the individual's base
period in which the wage credits were highest.
(d) Except as provided in section 2.5 of this chapter, an
individual's weekly benefit amount may not exceed five hundred
fourteen dollars ($514).
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


SECTION 10. IC 22-4-12-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) This section applies to
initial claims filed for any week beginning after June 30, 2026.
(b) For purposes of this section, "dependent":
(1) means:
(A) a lawful husband or wife who is unemployed and
currently ineligible for Indiana benefits because of
insufficient base period wages;
(B) a natural child;
(C) an adopted child;
(D) a stepchild of the claimant, if the stepchild is not
receiving temporary assistance to needy families; or
(E) a child placed in the claimant's home for adoption by
an authorized placement agency or a court of law, if the
child:
(i) is less than eighteen (18) years of age; and
(ii) has received more than one-half (1/2) the cost of
support from the claimant during the past ninety (90)
days (or for the duration of the relationship, if less)
immediately preceding the claimant's benefit year
beginning date; and
(2) includes the following:
(A) A person with a disability at least eighteen (18) years
of age who is a child of the claimant and who received
more than one-half (1/2) the cost of the person's support
from the claimant during the ninety (90) day period
immediately preceding the claimant's benefit year
beginning date.
(B) A child for whom the claimant is the court appointed
legal guardian.
(c) For purposes of subsection (b)(2):
(1) "child" includes:
(A) a natural child;
(B) an adopted child;
(C) a stepchild of the claimant, if the stepchild is not
receiving temporary assistance to needy families; or
(D) a child placed in the claimant's home for adoption by
an authorized placement agency or a court of law; and
(2) "person with a disability" means an individual who by
reason of physical or mental defect or infirmity, whether:
(A) congenital; or
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153


(B) acquired by accident, injury, or disease;
is totally or partially prevented from achieving the fullest
attainable physical, social, economic, mental, and vocational
participation in the normal process of living.
(d) In addition to the weekly benefit amount determined under
section 2 of this chapter, an eligible and qualified individual is
entitled to an additional benefit amount of fifty dollars ($50) per
week for each dependent claimed by the eligible and qualified
individual. However, the total additional weekly benefit provided
to an eligible and qualified individual under this subsection may
not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
2026 IN 265—LS 6672/DI 153